src/fst/incoming/verb_stems.lexc
LEXICON TR-sis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.sis@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-0-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.SUPERASPECT.REPETITIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-0s-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.SUPERASPECT.REPETITIVE@@U.TAMA.%0s@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-isi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.isi@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-isis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.isis@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ni-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-nis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nis@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-sis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.sis@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yi-a-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yii-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yii-yi@@U.VV.I@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yis-a-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yis-a@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yis-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yis-yi@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yi-yi-PFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.SUPERASPECT.REPETITIVE@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yis-yi-PFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.SUPERASPECT.REPETITIVE@@U.TAMA.yis-yi@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yi-POT
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.POTENTIAL@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yis-POT
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.POTENTIAL@@U.TAMA.yis@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yi-PROG
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PROGRESSIVE@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-yis-PROG
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PROGRESSIVE@@U.TAMA.yis@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON -0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-DOBJ3SGONLY@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-0s-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0s@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-ni-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-nii-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nii@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-0-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.SUPERASPECT.REPETITIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-ni-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-nis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-sis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.sis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-yis-a-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yis-a@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-yis-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yis-yi@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ARL-yis-PROG
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.PROGRESSIVE@@U.TAMA.yis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON -0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-WITHAREAL@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON -si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-WITHAREAL@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON -yi-POT
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE-WITHAREAL@@U.ASPECT.POTENTIAL@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON Transitive
dīsdīsh[shake_O_once]:dīH.dīsh	TR-isis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os11635, os11636, os11637
dīsk'ìs[flick_away_O]:dī.k'ìs	TR-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os04722, os04723, os04724
gwādísíd[spread_GO_out]:gwā_dí.síd	TR-yi-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os03766
istsad[eat_O]:tsad	TR-yi-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os01709, os01710, os01711, os01712, os01713, os01714, os01715
istsád[eat_O]:tsàd	TR-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os10846, os10848, os10853
k'ádìłìd[char]:k'á=dì.łit	TR-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os08185
k'ánīsdlōd[tear_O]:k'á=nī.dlōd	TR-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os12196, os12197
k'ásá[cut_O_off]:k'á=sá	TR-ni-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os09795, os09796, os09797, os09799
k'átsít[snap_O_off]:k'á=tsít	TR-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os11448, os11449, os11450, os11451
k'āstsō[undo_with_teeth]:k'ā=tsō	TR-yis-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os09644, os09645
káádìtò[look_for_O]:kóna=dì.tosh	TR-yi-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os10318
kútsìstà[put_head_in]:kútsì=tà	TR-nis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os11905
kúyá[walk_ahead_of_O]:kú=yá	TR-yi-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os06250, os06251, os06252
nishò[grow_up]:ni.shó	TR-isi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os01414
nishò[grow_up]:ni.shón	TR-isi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os01413, os01415, os01416, os01417
nà=gà[arrive_carrying_O_on_back]:nà=gín	TR-ni-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os01831, os01832, os01833, os01834, os01835, os01836, os01837, os01838, os01839, os01840
nàditł'īs[start_throw_SO_down]:nà=di.tł'os	TR-sis-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os06363
nàdīstsós[whip_O]:níná=dī.chōsh	TR-0s-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os04173
nàdītsì[defecate_stand]:nà=dī.tsì	TR-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os04629
nàdītł'ún[lace]:nìná=dī.tł'ush	TR-0-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os07599
nàni[sprinkle_GO_down]:nà=nił	TR-yi-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os06376
nàsxàł[throw_O_off]:nà=xàł	TR-yis-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os05535, os05536
nàtł'īs[roll_SO_down]:niná=tł'īsh	TR-0s-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os06364
nàtł'īs[roll_SO_down]:nà=tł'os	TR-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os06362
nák'átsítł'ó[run_behind_O]:nák'á=tsí.tł'ò	TR-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os09501, os09502
nákò[bring_SC_home]:níná=kón	TR-ni-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os08166
nánīst'à[pinch_O]:ná=nī.t'íy	TR-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os08347, os08348, os08349, os08352, os08353
násʔín[look_at_O]:ná=ná.ʔìsh	TR-yi-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os00510, os00511, os00512, os00513, os00514, os00515, os00516
nìsk'ánìtò[examine_O]:nìsk'áná=nì.tosh	TR-0-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os04680
nīshó[raise_O]:nī.shał	TR-yi-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os10117, os10118, os10135
tādītsīł[wash_O]:tāná=dīdī.chīłsh	TR-yi-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os01543
xàsgàs[bite_chunk_of_O]:xà=gààz	TR-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02354, os02355, os02356
xázū[scrape_O_off:xá=zūw	TR-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02461, os02462
yiʔín[see_O]:ʔín	TR-yi-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os00487, os00488, os00489, os00490, os00491, os00492, os00493, os00494
yìchánìtsā[brace_O]:yìcháná=nì.chish	TR-0-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os02412
yìyisk'a[dip_FO_in_O]:yìyiná=k'osh	TR-0s-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os04380
yìyá[put_O_on]:yì=yá	TR-yi-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os02382
zìsyí[kill_O]:zì.yí	TR-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os11538, os11539
àsní[push_O_with_hand]:à=nììzh	TR-nis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os03360, os03361, os03362, os03363, os03364
àsní[push_O_with_hand]:ná=í.nish	TR-yis-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os03357
àsní[push_O_with_hand]:í.nish	TR-yis-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os03356
àsní[push_O_with_hand]:í.nił	TR-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os03351, os03352, os03353, os03354, os03355
àsʔás[push_O_with_foot]:àná=ʔìsh	TR-0s-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os03384, os03385
ánátł'ò[catch_up_with]:á=ná.tł'ò	TR-ni-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os08518
áxànīyìs[bend_O_straight]:áxà=nī.yìs	TR-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07281
ìghá[kill]:ì.ghá	TR-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os10755, os10756, os10757, os10766
ích'ún[be_cautious_of_O]:í.ch'ún	TR-yii-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os09242, os09243
íditsāł[throw_RO]:ná=chìlsh	TR-0-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os04150
ílùt[lasso]:ná=lùt	TR-yis-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os07640
ísgàs[bite_O]:ná=í.gish	TR-yis-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os11683
ísní[push_O_with_hand]:í.nił	TR-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os03350
āstsíd[shove_O_quickly]:ā=tsíd	TR-nis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os08245
īchíízh[eat]:chíj	TR-yi-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os07451
īst'ùùzh[suckle_O]:ī.t'ùùzh	TR-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os12133, os12134, os12135
īstsīn[smell_O]:tsít	TR-isis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06870
ītł'ùn[braid]:tł'ún	TR-isi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07621
īyīstsàd:ī=tsàd	TR-yi-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07454
īīdàł[eat_berries]:dál	TR-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os04529, os04530, os04531, os04532, os04533, os04534, os04535, os04536, os04539, os04540, os04541
LEXICON Transitive-SubjSuppr
dísdo[pile_up_0_carelessly]:dí.do	TR-ARL-nis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os05223, os05224
dísdùk'[pile_up_O]:dí.duk'	TR-ARL-nis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os05222
dīnisdlú[get_startled_again]:nádīni.dlút	TR-ARL-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os12215, os12216
dītsòs[stretch]:dī.tsòs	TR-ARL-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07587
guk'átòs[cut_off_area]:guk'á=tòs	TR-ARL-ni-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os09141
guk'átòs[cut_off_area]:guk'á=tòs	TR-ARL-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os09142
k'ánīsch'úł[tear_off_O]:k'á=nī.ch'úł	TR-ARL-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os10293
k'ánīsch'úł[tear_off_O]:k'á=nī.ch'úł	TR-ARL-ni-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os10295
k'ánīsch'úł[tear_off_O]:k'á=nī.ch'úł	TR-ARL-ni-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os10294, os10296
k'átòs[cut_off]:k'á=t'ós	TR-ARL-ni-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os09140
mànádīkòsh[make_O_boom[]:à=dī.kòsh	TR-ARL-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os06756, os06757
nàgūdīstłód[stop_storm]:nà=gū_dī.tłód	TR-ARL-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os12103
nàgūdīstłód[stop_storm]:nà=gū_dī.tłód	TR-ARL-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os12102
nàsgū[pour_O_off]:nà=gū	TR-ARL-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06390
náyìsts'íl[scorch_O]:ná=yì.ts'ìl	TR-ARL-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os11721, os11722, os11723, os11724
náyìsts'íl[shrivel]:ná=yì.ts'ìl	TR-ARL-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os11715
náyīgół[be_drying]:ná=gół	TR-ARL-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os04466
tatùn[shatter]:ta=tùn	TR-ARL-nis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02444
tàdīsts'í[blow_upwards]:tà=dī.ts'í	TR-ARL-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os10998, os10999, os11000
tāyīdīnīsts'ìst[fill_up_O]:tā=dìni.ts'ìst	TR-ARL-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os02094, os02097, os02098
tāyīdīnīsts'ìst[fill_up_O]:tā=dìni.ts'ìst	TR-ARL-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os02096, os02099
xàsgàs[bite_chunk_of_O]:xà=gàs	TR-ARL-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02357, os02358
xákàd:xá=di.kàd	TR-ARL-ni-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os02567
áchágúdìnīsghás[lengthen_O]:áchá=gú_dìnī.ghás	TR-ARL-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os11904
ásdí[train_O]:á=dìn	TR-ARL-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02450
átłàstłún[tie_O_together]:átłà=tłún	TR-ARL-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07651
ìdīt'ú[shoot_O]:ìdī.t'úw	TR-ARL-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os11788, os11789, os11790
ích'ún[be_cautious_of_O]:í.ch'ún	TR-ARL-nii-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os09246
īsdùwà[consume]:dùwà	TR-ARL-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os10487
īst'ó[feather_arrow]:t'ón	TR-ARL-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os04719, os04720, os04721
ōghàgùstłó[give_O]:ōghà=gù_tłísh	TR-ARL-0-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os09163
